Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Corrections, in cooperation with the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission,  shall establish a pilot program to provide legal services that assist
women who are incarcerated at the Coffee  Creek Correctional Facility to reenter and rein-
tegrate into local communities, to reduce the womens’ vulnerability  to domestic violence and
to obtain employment, housing services and other benefits.
(2) The commission shall carry out the purposes of  subsection (1) of this section by
granting to the Oregon Justice Resource Center  an amount sufficient for the center to em-
ploy three attorneys and to provide necessary support for the attorneys’ work.
(3) The commission and the Oregon Justice Resource Center shall  evaluate the oper-
ations and success  of the pilot program and report the results of the department’s evaluation
to an interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly related to corrections not later than
September 15, 2021.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  by section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5506), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, is  increased by
$800,000 to pay for a grant  to the Oregon Justice Resource Center for a pilot program to
provide legal services to women who are  incarcerated at the Coffee Creek Correctional Fa-
cility.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 31, 2021.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2631 (HB 2631-B) Page 1
Passed by House June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2631 (HB 2631-B) Page 2